District of Columbia statutes.
47-3710

Certification of payment by Mayor.

When the Mayor is satisfied that the tax liability imposed by this chapter has been fully discharged or provided for, the Mayor may certify that fact.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 11, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3710.